Tennessee, session 114, SB2688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32 of the Private Acts of 2009, and any other amendatory acts
thereto, is amended by deleting Section 2.09 in its entirety and substituting instead:
Section 2.09. Vacancy in office of Mayor or Commissioner. A vacancy shall
exist if the mayor or a city commissioner resigns, dies, moves their residence from the
city, or is removed from office under Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 47.
The city commission shall declare a vacancy to exist for any of these reasons.
Any person convicted of malfeasance or misfeasance in office, a felony, or a
crime involving moral turpitude shall be prohibited from holding office with the city for a
period of ten (10) years.
The remaining city commissioners shall appoint a qualified person to fill a
vacancy, and the person so appointed shall serve until the next regular city election. At
the next regular city election, any remaining unexpired term shall be filled.
In the event of any vacancy on the commission which such commissioners shall
fail or neglect to fill such vacancy within forty-five (45) days of its occurrence, the mayor
shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy within fifteen (15) days.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Adamsville. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SB2688
010874
- 1 -

SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
- 2 - 010874